Hawaii statutes.
§286-25 Operation of a vehicle or moped
without a certificate of inspection. [Section effective January 1,
2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see main volume.] Whoever
operates, permits the operation of, causes to be operated, or parks any vehicle
or moped on a public highway without a current official certificate of
inspection, issued under section 286-26, shall be fined not more than $100. [L
1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-25; am L 1972, c 18, §1; am L 1974, c 106, §1;
am L 1993, c 214, §3; am L 2016, c 200, §10]

Case Notes

Statute applied to defendant, where defendant argued that
traffic statutes involved only applied to businesses and state vehicles;
statute did not violate defendant’s freedom of movement. 77 H. 222 (App.), 883
P.2d 644.

It is within the power of the legislature to motivate
compliance with safety inspection and liability insurance laws by imposing the
penalty specified in this section; because the offense of "expired safety
sticker" is a civil traffic infraction and not a criminal offense, the
district court improperly found motorist "guilty". 107 H. 508
(App.), 115 P.3d 687.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next